District of Columbia statutes.
24-926

Discipline.

(a)

Eligible juvenile offenders are expected to adhere to strict standards of discipline within the BOOT CAMP. Eligible juvenile offenders in the BOOT CAMP will be expected to comply with the following procedures:

(1)

Stand-up count;

(2)

Keeping living areas clean and neat at all times;

(3)

Mandatory attendance at all scheduled functions; and

(4)

Exhibiting respectful behavior towards drill instructors and other personnel.

(b)

The Director shall promulgate rules and procedures governing discipline within the BOOT CAMP.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 205, 40 DCR 5768

History

1981 Ed., § 24-826.

Prior Codifications